Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.003

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Department" means the department of enterprise services.

(2) "Director" means the director of enterprise services.

(3) "State agency" means every state agency, office, officer, board, commission, institution, and institution of higher education, including all state universities, regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and community and technical colleges.

[ 2017 c 318 s 1; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 102.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: "Except for sections 109, 448, 462, and 732 of this act, this act takes effect October 1, 2011." [ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 1017.]

Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: "To maximize the benefits to the public, state government should be operated in an efficient and effective manner. The department of enterprise services is created to provide centralized leadership in efficiently and cost-effectively managing resources necessary to support the delivery of state government services. The mission of the department is to implement a world-class, customer-focused organization that provides valued products and services to government and state residents." [ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 101.]